Washington statutes.
RCW 38.40.050

Discharge from employment—Penalty.

No member of the organized militia of Washington shall be discharged by his or her employer by reason of the performance of any military duties upon which he or she may be ordered. When any member of the organized militia of Washington is ordered upon active state service or inactive duty which takes the member from his or her employment the member may apply upon the termination of such duty to be restored to his or her position and employment, and if the tour of duty shall have continued for a period not longer than three months, any employer or the officer or manager of any firm or corporation having authority to reemploy such member and failing to do so shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor, and on conviction thereof shall be fined in any sum not exceeding five hundred dollars, or imprisonment in the county jail for a period not exceeding six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 1989 c 19 s 49; 1943 c 130 s 48; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-48. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 43; 1909 c 134 s 69; 1895 c 108 s 104, part.]